District of Columbia statutes.
46-251.03

Medical support notice; contents; effect.

(a)

A medical support notice shall be issued in a format consistent with federal requirements and shall contain all information required by federal law. A medical support notice shall:

(1)

Conform with the requirements applicable to medical child support orders under section 609(a) of the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, approved August 10, 1993 (107 Stat. 371; 29 U.S.C. § 1169(a)), in connection with group health plans;

(2)

Conform with the requirements of section 466(a)(19) of the Social Security Act, approved August 16, 1984 (98 Stat. 1306; 42 U.S.C. § 666(a)(19));

(3)

Include a separate and easily severable employer withholding notice that informs the employer of:

(A)

The employer’s obligations under § 46-251.07 to withhold employee contributions due in connection with health insurance coverage a parent is required to provide for a child pursuant to a support order;

(B)

The duration of the withholding requirement as stated in § 1-307.42(3);

(C)

The applicability of the limits on withholding imposed under section 303 (b) of the Consumer Credit Protection Act, approved May 29, 1968 (82 Stat. 163; 15 U.S.C. § 1673(b));

(D)

The applicability of any prioritization required under § 46-251.08 when the employee’s earnings are insufficient to satisfy fully through withholding the employee’s obligations to provide cash support and contributions for health insurance coverage for the child;

(E)

The name and telephone number of the appropriate person to contact at the IV-D agency about the medical support notice;

(F)

The employee’s right to contest the withholding based on mistake of fact pursuant to § 46-251.09, and the employer’s obligation to initiate and continue the withholding until the employer receives notice that the contest is resolved; and

(G)

The applicability of sanctions against the employer under § 46-251.10 for discharging, refusing to employ, or taking disciplinary action against a parent because of the requirement to withhold employee contributions for health insurance coverage, or for failing to withhold or remit earnings.

(b)

An appropriately completed medical support notice that meets the requirements of section 401(b) of the Child Support Performance and Incentive Act of 1998, approved July 16, 1998 (112 Stat. 663; 42 U.S.C. § 651 note), shall be deemed to be a qualified medical child support order under section 609(a)(2) of the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, approved August 10, 1993 (107 Stat. 371; 29 U.S.C. § 1169(a)(2)).

(c)

A medical support notice issued in another jurisdiction shall be treated under this subchapter in the same manner as a medical support notice issued in the District of Columbia.

History

Mar. 30, 2004, D.C. Law 15-130, § 103, 51 DCR 1615

Temporary Addition of Section

For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 103 of Medical Support Establishment and Enforcement Temporary Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Law 14-238, March 25, 2003, law notification 50 DCR 2751).
For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 103 of Medical Support Establishment and Enforcement Temporary Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Law 15-84, March 10, 2004, law notification 51 DCR 3376).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition of this section, see § 103 of Medical Support Establishment and Enforcement Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-485, October 3, 2002, 49 DCR 9631).
For temporary (90 day) addition of this section, see § 103 of Medical Support Establishment and Enforcement Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-600, January 7, 2003, 50 DCR 664).
For temporary (90 day) addition of this section, see § 103 of Medical Support Establishment and Enforcement Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-208, October 24, 2003, 50 DCR 9856).
For temporary (90 day) addition of this section, see § 103 of Medical Support Establishment and Enforcement Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-330, January 28, 2004, 51 DCR 1603).